Louisiana, session 2026, HB390.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part VIII of Chapter 9 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 23:1006.1, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART VIII. UNPAID LEAVE FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SURVIVORS
§1006.1. Unpaid leave for employed domestic abuse survivors
A. An employer shall allow an employee to take up to three working days
of unpaid leave from work in any twelve-month period if the employee is subjected
to domestic abuse and if the leave is for any of the following reasons:
(1) To seek medical care or mental health counseling for the employee to
recover from physical or psychological injury or disability caused by the domestic
abuse.
(2) To obtain services from a victim service organization, including but not
limited to a domestic abuse shelter or program.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1082 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 390
(3) To obtain psychological or other counseling.
(4) To allow the employee the opportunity to temporarily or permanently
relocate.
(5) To take legal action, including but not limited to preparing for or
participating in any civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or resulting from the
domestic abuse.
B. An employer may request an employee seeking leave required by this
Section to provide any of the following:
(1) Confirmation of a scheduled appointment from a licensed counselor,
healthcare provider, or attorney.
(2) A protective order.
(3) A police report.
(4) A summons to appear in court for a civil or criminal proceeding.
C. An employer shall not discharge, demote, suspend, retaliate, or in any
other manner discriminate against an employee for exercising the employee's right
to take leave as provided by this Section.
D. This Section shall apply only to an employer who employs fifty or more
employees.